Maryland, session 2025, HB1385.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–136.
(A) (1) EACH COUNTY BOARD, IN CONSULTATION WITH PARENTS,
TEACHERS, AND SCHOOL PERSONNEL, SHALL DEVELOP AND IMPLEMENT A POLICY
TO PROMOTE THE INVOLVEMENT OF THE PARENTS IN THE EDUCATION OF STUDENTS
IN THE COUNTY.
(2) THE POLICY DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL
INCLUDE A PLAN FOR:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1385*

HOUSE BILL 1385
(I) INCREASING PARENT PARTICIPATION IN SCHOOLS; AND
(II) IMPROVING PARENT AND TEACHER COOPERATION IN
AREAS RELATING TO HOMEWORK, ATTENDANCE, AND DISCIPLINE.
(3) THE POLICY DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL
INCLUDE PROCEDURES FOR:
(I) PARENTS TO REVIEW AND EXAMINE ALL CURRICULA AND
INSTRUCTIONAL MATERIALS BEING TAUGHT TO A STUDENT, INCLUDING PROVIDING
A MEANS TO READ AND REVIEW OR COPY AND RECORD, AT COST, ALL CURRICULA,
INSTRUCTIONAL MATERIALS, AND ANY TEACHER TRAINING MATERIALS USED BY
THE STUDENT’S TEACHER BY ANY OF THE FOLLOWING METHODS:
1. PUBLICATION ON A PUBLICLY AVAILABLE WEBSITE;
OR
2. A WRITTEN COPY PROVIDED TO PARENTS ON
REQUEST;
(II) PARENTS TO BE INFORMED ON THE NATURE AND PURPOSE
OF ALL SCHOOL CLUBS AND EXTRACURRICULAR ACTIVITIES;
(III) PARENTS TO OBJECT AND WITHDRAW THE PARENTS’
STUDENT FROM ANY:
1. SCHOOL CLUB OR EXTRACURRICULAR ACTIVITY;
2. UNIT OF INSTRUCTION IN THE CLASSROOM; OR
3. PRESENTATION OR SCHOOL ASSEMBLY; AND
(IV) OBTAINING PARENTAL CONSENT BEFORE A STUDENT USES
GENDER PRONOUNS THAT DO NOT MATCH WITH THE STUDENT’S BIOLOGICAL SEX.
(4) THE POLICY DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL
INCLUDE:
(I) NOTICE FROM A SCHOOL AT LEAST 5 DAYS IN ADVANCE OF,
AND THE PROCESS FOR OBTAINING PARENTAL CONSENT FOR, PLANNED
INSTRUCTION ON OR ATTENDANCE AT A PRESENTATION ABOUT STUDYING ANY
TOPIC COVERED IN FAMILY LIFE AND HUMAN SEXUALITY;

HOUSE BILL 1385 3
(II) A PROCESS FOR A PARENT TO WITHDRAW THE PARENT’S
STUDENT FROM SPECIFIC INSTRUCTION OR A PRESENTATION IN SCHOOL THAT THE
PARENT BELIEVES MIGHT BE HARMFUL TO THE STUDENT;
(III) PARENTAL ACCESS TO ALL WRITTEN AND ELECTRONIC
RECORDS CONCERNING A STUDENT THAT ARE CONTROLLED OR IN POSSESSION OF
THE SCHOOL, THE COUNTY BOARD, OR AN OUTSIDE ORGANIZATION CONTRACTED TO
PROVIDE SERVICES TO STUDENTS AT THE SCHOOL; AND
(IV) A PROHIBITION ON TEACHERS AND OTHER SCHOOL
PERSONNEL WITHHOLDING OR CONCEALING INFORMATION FROM PARENTS,
INCLUDING INFORMATION RELATING TO A STUDENT’S:
1. CURRICULAR OR EXTRACURRICULAR PROJECTS,
ASSIGNMENTS, OR ACTIVITIES; OR
2. PHYSICAL, EMOTIONAL, OR MENTAL HEALTH.
(B) A PARENT MAY FILE A WRITTEN COMPLAINT FOR A VIOLATION OF THE
POLICY UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
(C) ON RECEIPT OF A COMPLAINT UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION, A COUNTY SUPERINTENDENT SHALL:
(1) INVESTIGATE THE COMPLAINT; AND
(2) WITHIN 14 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING THE COMPLAINT, PROVIDE A
WRITTEN RESPONSE TO THE COMPLAINANT DESCRIBING THE ACTIONS BEING
TAKEN BY THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM OR THE REMEDY BEING PROPOSED.
(D) (1) (I) A PARENT MAY APPEAL THE DECISION OF THE COUNTY
SUPERINTENDENT UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION TO THE COUNTY
BOARD WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING THE COUNTY SUPERINTENDENT’S
RESPONSE.
(II) AN APPEAL UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH SHALL CONTAIN:
1. DETAILS OF THE ALLEGED VIOLATION FROM THE
COMPLAINT FILED WITH THE COUNTY SUPERINTENDENT;
2. A COPY OF THE COUNTY SUPERINTENDENT’S
RESPONSE; AND

HOUSE BILL 1385
3. THE REASONS WHY THE PARENT FINDS THE COUNTY
SUPERINTENDENT’S RESPONSE INSUFFICIENT.
(2) A COUNTY BOARD SHALL APPOINT A COMMITTEE TO ADDRESS
APPEALS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(3) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF AN APPEAL UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE COMMITTEE SHALL PUBLISH A WRITTEN
REPORT CONTAINING ANY FINDINGS OF FACT AND RECOMMENDED ACTIONS FOR
THE COUNTY BOARD.
(4) (I) FOR EACH APPEAL, THE COUNTY BOARD SHALL VOTE TO
ACCEPT OR REJECT THE RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE COMMITTEE.
(II) THE DECISION OF THE COUNTY BOARD REGARDING AN
APPEAL IS FINAL.
(E) (1) A PARENT MAY BRING AN ACTION IN A COURT OF APPROPRIATE
JURISDICTION AGAINST A COUNTY BOARD FOR ANY CONTINUING VIOLATIONS OF
THE POLICY UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) IN AN ACTION BROUGHT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, A COURT MAY
GRANT APPROPRIATE RELIEF.
(3) AN ACTION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE BROUGHT ONLY
AFTER THE PARENT HAS EXHAUSTED ALL ADMINISTRATIVE REMEDIES AVAILABLE
UNDER SUBSECTIONS (B), (C), AND (D) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.